Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.090

Meetings.

A board of trustees shall meet on the call of its chair on a regular monthly meeting day when there is business to come before it. The chair shall be required to call a meeting on any regular meeting day at the request of any member of the fund or his or her beneficiary claiming any relief or retirement pension.

[ 1999 c 148 s 9; 1945 c 261 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-23.]